Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 27 Vocational Rehabilitation [Repealed.]

16-27-1 — 16-27-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1737, §§ 1 and 3; P.L. 1921, ch. 2031, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2033, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1737, § 5; P.L. 1921, chs. 20 and 33, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 79, §§ 1, 3, 5-7; P.L. 1927, ch. 1039, § 1; P.L. 1934, ch. 2129, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2293, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 183, §§ 1, 3, 5-8; G.L. 1938, ch. 183, §§ 2, 4, 9, 10; P.L. 1949, ch. 2215, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3553, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §§

16-27-1

—

16-27-1

1; P.L. 1959, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 221, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1974, ch. 123, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 1. For present law, see §

42-12-8

et seq.